Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2527
Occupational therapy assistant; supervision required.

An occupational therapy assistant may deliver occupational therapy services enumerated in section 38-2510 in collaboration with and under the supervision of an occupational therapist.

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 125;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-6119;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 867;

Laws 2025, LB257, § 17.